Hawaii, session 2025, SB1236.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that art feeds the human spirit and offers priceless value. Art inspires, educates, and challenges individuals to think differently, while making the world a more beautiful and interesting place.  The legislature further finds that Hawaii was the first state in the nation to adopt a percent-for-art law, which designated one per cent of construction costs of new buildings for the acquisition of works of art through Act 298, Session Laws of Hawaii 1967 (Act 298).  The purpose of the law was to beautify state buildings and increase public access to the arts.  Act 298 statutorily established that "the original construction of any state building shall include ... an amount of one percent of the appropriation for the acquisition of works of art which may be an integral part of the structure ..."  This original statute was carefully crafted to maintain fiscal integrity in the use of long-term capital funding. The legislature expanded on this effort by enacting Act 389, Session Laws of Hawaii 1989, which created the works of art special fund.  The legislature finds that this program has been a success, with works of art enhancing the physical environment of state buildings and providing educational visual arts opportunities to the public through the art in public places program. Additionally, the State currently possesses a surplus of artwork in storage for current and future uses. More recent efforts have focused on the expansion of programs to include performing arts and other initiatives that would enhance an array of art programming across the State.  Even as programs evolve and change over the years, it is imperative that sound financial management be exercised to ensure the stability of factors that may affect the State's creditworthiness. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to: (1)  Specify that the works of art special fund's one per cent transfer requirement shall apply only to capital improvement appropriations for the original construction of state buildings; (2)  Amend the authority for funds from the works of art special fund to solely be used for costs related to the acquisition of works of art; and (3)  Appropriate general funds to, and authorize the use of federal funds for, the state foundation on culture and the arts: (A)  To support certain positions and activities of the state foundation on culture and the arts; (B)  For performing arts initiatives; and (C)  To expand arts programming in schools. SECTION 2.  Section 103-8.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsections (a) and (b) to read as follows: "(a) There is created a works of art special fund, into which shall be transferred one per cent of all state fund appropriations for capital improvements designated for the original construction [cost element; provided that this transfer shall apply only to capital improvement appropriations that are designated for the construction or renovation] of state buildings.  The one per cent transfer requirement shall not apply to appropriations from the passenger facility charge special fund established by section 261-5.5 and the rental motor vehicle customer facility charge special fund established under section 261-5.6. (b)  The works of art special fund shall be used solely for [the following purposes: (1)  Costs] costs related to the acquisition of works of art[, including any consultant or staff services required to carry out the art in public places and relocatable works of art programs; (2)  Site modifications, display, and interpretive work necessary for the exhibition of works of art; (3)  Upkeep services, including maintenance, repair, and restoration of works of art; (4)  Storing and transporting works of art]." SECTION 3.  The following sums or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and fiscal year 2026-2027 are appropriated or authorized, as the case may be, from moneys in the treasury received from general revenues and federal funds to be expended by the state foundation on culture and the arts to finance the positions and other cost items listed below.  The letter symbols used after the specific appropriations indicate the source of financing and have the following meaning:  (A) general revenues, (N)  federal funds. Prog ID/Org Position Title/Program Description Position # MOF FTE (P) FY 26 FY 27 AGS 881 LA Secretary II 16047 A 1.00 47,004 47,004 AGS 881 LA Administrative Services Assistant 21199 A 0.75 47,322 47,322 AGS 881 LA Administrative Services Assistant 21199 N 0.25 15,774 15,774 AGS 881 LA Office Assistant III 21352 A 0.75 28,404 28,404 AGS 881 LA Office Assistant III 21352 N 0.25 7,560 7,560 AGS 881 LA Arts Program Specialist III 26529 A 1.00 71,016 71,016 AGS 881 LA Arts Program Specialist IV 27869 A 1.00 71,016 71,016 AGS 881 LA Accountant IV 31184 A 0.75 67,365 67,365 AGS 881 LA Accountant IV 31184 N 0.25 22,455 22,455 AGS 881 LA Arts Program Specialist II 32873 N 1.00 56,064 56,064 AGS 881 LA Arts Program Specialist III 39045 N 1.00 58,296 58,296 AGS 881 LA Arts Program Specialist II 36841 A 1.00 73,836 73,836 AGS 881 LA Information Specialist III 45697 A 0.75 47,322 47,322 AGS 881 LA Information Specialist III 45697 N 0.25 15,774 15,774 AGS 881 LA Account Clerk III 45700 A 0.75 31,356 31,356 AGS 881 LA Account Clerk III 45700 N 0.25 10,452 10,452 AGS 881 LA Arts Program Specialist III 47047 N 1.00 60,660 60,660 AGS 881 LA Arts Program Specialist III 48120 A 1.00 63,096 63,096 AGS 881 LA Arts Program Specialist II 52285 A 1.00 56,064 56,064 AGS 881 LA Arts Program Specialist II 52286 A 1.00 56,064 56,064 AGS 881 LA Arts Program Specialist II 52287 A 1.00 58,203 58,203 AGS 881 LA Arts Program Specialist III 52288 A 1.00 63,096 63,096 AGS 881 LA Arts Program Specialist III 52290 A 1.00 65,664 65,664 AGS 881 LA Executive Director, SFCA 100256 A 0.75 110,781 110,781 AGS 881 LA Executive Director, SFCA 100256 N 0.25 36,927 36,927 AGS 881 LA Arts Program Specialist II 112785 A 1.00 59,748 59,748 AGS 881 LA Arts Program Specialist II 112788 A 1.00 63,096 63,096 AGS 881 LA Arts Program Specialist III 122671 A 1.00 60,660 60,660 AGS 881 LA Hawaii State Art Museum A 1,857,580 1,857,580 AGS 881 LA Interpretive Work A 425,000 425,000 AGS 881 LA Operating A 201,923 201,923 AGS 881 LA Consultant Services A 35,000 35,000 AGS 881 LA Registration A 34,000 34,000 AGS 881 LA Upkeep Services A 29,530 29,530 AGS 881 LA Display A 285,580 285,580 AGS 881 LA Transportation A 19,085 19,085 Total A 17.50 4,028,811 4,028,811 N 4.50 283,962 283,962 SECTION 4.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $ or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for performing arts initiatives. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the state foundation on culture and the arts for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 5.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to expand arts programming in schools. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the state foundation on culture and the arts for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 6.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 7.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________